Utah, session 2026, SB22.
Section 1. Section 53-3-204 is amended to read:53-3-204. Persons who may not be licensed.(1)(a)The division may not license a person who:(i)is younger than 16 years old;(ii)if the person is 18 years old or younger, has not completed a course in driver training approved by the commissioner;(iii)if the person is 19 years old or older has not completed:(A)a course in driver training approved by the commissioner; or(B)the requirements under described in Subsection 53-3-210.5(6)(c) 53-3-210.5(7)(c);(iv)if the person is a minor as defined in Section 53-3-211, has not completed the driving requirement under described in Section 53-3-211;(v)is not a resident of the state, unless the person:(A)is issued a temporary CDL under Subsection 53-3-407(2)(b) prior to before July 1, 2015; or(B)qualifies for a non- domiciled CDL as defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 383;(vi)if the person is 17 years old or younger, has not held a learner permit issued under Section 53-3-210.5 or an equivalent by another state or branch of the United States Armed Forces for six months; or(vii)is younger than 18 years old and applying for a CDL under 49 C.F.R. Part 383.(b)Subsections (1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), and (vi) do not apply to a personan individual:(i)who has been licensed before July 1, 1967; or(ii)who is 16 years old or older making application applying for a license who has been licensed in another state or country.(2)The division may not issue a license certificate to a person an individual:(a)whose license has been suspended, denied, cancelled, or disqualified during the period of suspension, denial, cancellation, or disqualification;(b)whose privilege has been revoked, except as provided in Section 53-3-225;(c)who has previously been adjudged mentally incompetent and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency as provided by law;(d)who is required by  under this chapter to take an examination unless the person individual successfully passes the examination;(e)whose driving privileges have been are denied or suspended under:(i)Section 80-6-707 by an order of the juvenile court; or(ii)Section 53-3-231; or(f)beginning on or after July 1, 2012, who holds an unexpired Utah identification card issued under Part 8, Identification Card Act, unless:(i)the Utah identification card is canceled; and(ii)if the Utah identification card is in the person's possession, the Utah identification card is surrendered to the division.(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) (3)(b) or (c), the division may not grant a motorcycle endorsement to a person  an individual who:(i)has not been granted does not hold an original or provisional class D license, a CDL, or an out-of-state equivalent to an original or provisional class D license or a CDL; and or(ii)if the person  individual is under 19 years old, has not held a motorcycle learner permit for two months unless Subsection (3)(b) applies.(b)The division may waive the two -month motorcycle learner permit holding period requirement under described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii) if the person  individual proves to the satisfaction of the division that the person  individual has completed a motorcycle rider education program that meets the requirements under  described in Section 53-3-903.(c)The division may grant a motorcycle endorsement to a person  an individual under 19 years old who has not held a motorcycle learner permit for two months if the person  individual was issued a motorcycle endorsement prior to before July 1, 2008.(4)The division may grant a class D license to a person  an individual whose commercial license is disqualified under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, if the person is not otherwise sanctioned under this chapter.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-3-210.5 is amended to read:53-3-210.5. Learner permit.(1)As used in this section, "parent" means an individual's parent, stepparent, or foster parent.(2)The division, upon receiving an application for a learner permit, may issue a learner permit effective for 18 months to an applicant who is at least 15 years old.(2)(3)(a)The learner permit entitles an applicant that is 18 years old or older to operate a class D motor vehicle only if a person  an individual 21 years old or older who is a licensed driver is occupying a seat beside the applicant.(b)The learner permit entitles an applicant that is younger than 18 years old to operate a class D motor vehicle only if:(i)an approved driving instructor is occupying a seat beside the applicant;(ii)the applicant's parent or legal guardian, who must be  is a licensed driver, is occupying a seat beside the applicant;(iii)a responsible adult who has signed for the applicant under Section 53-3-211 and who must be  is a licensed driver, is occupying a seat beside the applicant; or(iv)(A)a responsible individual 21 years old or older who is not the parent or legal guardian is occupying a seat beside the applicant; and:(A)(B)the applicant's parent or legal guardian is not a licensed driver; and(B)(C)the individual occupying the seat beside the applicant  described in Subsection (3)(b)(iv)(A) is a licensed driver and has in the individual's immediate possession evidence that the individual is authorized by the applicant's parent or legal guardian to accompany the applicant while operating the motor vehicle; and.(C)the individual occupying the seat beside the applicant is a licensed driver.(c)The applicant shall have the learner permit in the applicant's immediate possession while operating the motor vehicle.(3)(4)The division shall issue a learner permit to an applicant who:(a)is at least 15 years old;(b)has passed the knowledge test required by the division;(c)has passed the physical and mental fitness tests; and(d)has submitted a nonrefundable fee for a learner permit under described in Section 53-3-105.(4)(5)(a)The division shall supply the learner permit form.(b)The form under described in Subsection (4)(a)  (5)(a) shall include:(i)the applicant's full name, date of birth, sex, Utah residence address, height, weight, and eye color;(ii)the date of issuance and expiration of the permit; and(iii)the conditions and restrictions contained described in this section for operating a class D motor vehicle.(5)(6)An application and fee for a learner permit entitle the applicant to:(a)not more than three attempts to pass the knowledge test for a class D license within one year; and(b)a learner permit after the knowledge test is passed passing the knowledge test.(6)(7)(a)If an applicant has been issued a learner permit under this section or an equivalent by another state or branch of the United States Armed Forces, the applicant may be issued an original or provisional class D license from the division upon:(i)except as provided in Subsection (7)(c), completing a driver education course in a:(A)a commercial driver training school licensed under Part 5, Commercial Driver Training Schools Act; or(B)a driver education program approved by the State Board of Education or the division;(ii)passing a knowledge test approved by the division that complies with the requirement of  Subsection (6)(d) (7)(d);(iii)passing the skills test approved by the division;(iv)reaching 16 years old; and(v)paying the nonrefundable fee for an original or provisional class D license application under described in Section 53-3-105.(b)In addition to the requirements under described in Subsection (6)(a) (7)(a), an applicant who is 17 years old or younger is required to  shall hold a learner permit for six months before applying for a provisional class D license.(c)An applicant is exempt from the requirement under described in Subsection (6)(a)(i)  (7)(a)(i) if the applicant:(i)is 19 years old or older;(ii)holds a learner permit for three months before applying for an original class D license; and(iii)certifies that the applicant, under the authority of a permit issued under this chapter, has completed at least 40 hours of driving a motor vehicle, of which at least 10 hours were completed during night hours after sunset.(d)Fifty percent of the test questions included in the knowledge test required under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)  (7)(a)(ii) shall cover the topic of major causes of traffic related deaths as identified in statistics published by the Highway Safety Office.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.